Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4117
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that wrongfully convicted persons have an opportunity to establish their innocence through deoxyribonucleic acid, DNA, testing.

Laws 2001, LB 659, § 2.

The DNA Testing Act is a limited remedy providing inmates an opportunity to obtain DNA testing in order to establish innocence after a conviction. State v. Myers, 304 Neb. 789, 937 N.W.2d 181 (2020).